test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-ae_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - rottá:
    rottá+N+Sg+Nom:  rottá
    rottá+N+Sg+Gen:  roˊtá
    rottá+N+Sg+Acc:  roˊtá
    rottá+N+Sg+Ill:  rootán
    rottá+N+Sg+Loc:  rottáást
    rottá+N+Sg+Com:  rottáin
    rottá+N+Sg+Abe:  roˊtáttáá
    rottá+N+Ess:  rottán
    rottá+N+Par:  rottád
    rottá+N+Pl+Nom:  roˊtáh
    rottá+N+Pl+Gen:  roˊtái
    rottá+N+Pl+Acc:  rottáid
    rottá+N+Pl+Ill:  rottáid
    rottá+N+Pl+Loc:  roˊtáin
    rottá+N+Pl+Com:  roˊtáiguin
    rottá+N+Pl+Abe:  roˊtáittáá

  Noun - sohvá:
    sohvá+N+Sg+Nom:  sohvá
    sohvá+N+Sg+Gen:  soˊhvá
    sohvá+N+Sg+Acc: soˊhvá
    sohvá+N+Sg+Ill:  soohván
    sohvá+N+Sg+Loc:  sohváást
    sohvá+N+Sg+Com:  sohváin
    sohvá+N+Sg+Abe:  soˊhváttáá
    sohvá+N+Ess:  sohván
    sohvá+N+Par:  sohvád
    sohvá+N+Pl+Nom:  soˊhváh
    sohvá+N+Pl+Gen:  soˊhvái
    sohvá+N+Pl+Acc:  sohváid
    sohvá+N+Pl+Ill:  sohváid
    sohvá+N+Pl+Loc:  soˊhváin
    sohvá+N+Pl+Com:  soˊhváiguin
    sohvá+N+Pl+Abe:  soˊhváittáá

  Noun - rovvá:
    rovvá+N+Sg+Nom:  rovvá
    rovvá+N+Sg+Gen:  roṿá
    rovvá+N+Sg+Acc:  roṿá
    rovvá+N+Sg+Ill:  rooṿán
    rovvá+N+Sg+Loc:  rovváást
    rovvá+N+Sg+Com:  rovváin
    rovvá+N+Sg+Abe:  roṿáttáá
    rovvá+N+Ess:  rovván
    rovvá+N+Par:  rovvád
    rovvá+N+Pl+Nom:  roṿáh
    rovvá+N+Pl+Gen:  roṿái
    rovvá+N+Pl+Acc:  rovváid
    rovvá+N+Pl+Ill:  rovváid
    rovvá+N+Pl+Loc:  rovváin
    rovvá+N+Pl+Com:  roṿáiguin
    rovvá+N+Pl+Abe:  roṿáittáá

  Noun - poorá:
    poorá+N+Sg+Nom:  poorá ! Uánánem ij tooimâ taan säänist
    poorá+N+Sg+Gen:  poorá
    poorá+N+Sg+Acc:  poorá
    poorá+N+Sg+Ill:  poorán
    poorá+N+Sg+Loc:  poorást
    poorá+N+Sg+Com:  pooráin
    poorá+N+Sg+Abe:  pooráttáá
    poorá+N+Ess:  poorán
    poorá+N+Par:  poorád
    poorá+N+Pl+Nom:  pooráh
    poorá+N+Pl+Gen:  poorái
    poorá+N+Pl+Acc:  pooráid
    poorá+N+Pl+Ill:  pooráid
    poorá+N+Pl+Loc:  pooráin
    poorá+N+Pl+Com:  pooráiguin
    poorá+N+Pl+Abe:  pooráittáá

  Noun - loová:
    loová+N+Sg+Nom:  loová ! Ij uánánem
    loová+N+Sg+Gen:  loová
    loová+N+Sg+Acc:  loová
    loová+N+Sg+Ill:  loován
    loová+N+Sg+Loc:  loovást
    loová+N+Sg+Com:  loováin
    loová+N+Sg+Abe:  loováttáá
    loová+N+Ess:  loován
    loová+N+Par:  loovád
    loová+N+Pl+Nom:  loováh
    loová+N+Pl+Gen:  loovái
    loová+N+Pl+Acc:  loováid
    loová+N+Pl+Ill:  loováid
    loová+N+Pl+Loc:  loováin
    loová+N+Pl+Com:  loováiguin
    loová+N+Pl+Abe:  loováittáá

  Noun - luvdá:
    luvdá+N+Sg+Nom:  luvdá
    luvdá+N+Sg+Gen:  luuvdá
    luvdá+N+Sg+Acc:  luuvdá
    luvdá+N+Sg+Ill:  luuvdán
    luvdá+N+Sg+Loc:  luuvdást
    luvdá+N+Sg+Com:  luvdáin
    luvdá+N+Sg+Abe:  luˊvdáttáá
    luvdá+N+Ess:  luvdán
    luvdá+N+Par:  luvdád
    luvdá+N+Pl+Nom: luuvdáh
    luvdá+N+Pl+Gen: [luuvdái, luˊvdái]
    luvdá+N+Pl+Acc:  luuvdáid
    luvdá+N+Pl+Ill:  luvdáid
    luvdá+N+Pl+Loc:  luuvdáin
    luvdá+N+Pl+Com:  luˊvdáiguin
    luvdá+N+Pl+Abe:  luˊvdáittáá

  Noun - kukká:
    kukká+N+Sg+Nom:  kukká
    kukká+N+Sg+Gen:  kuˊká
    kukká+N+Sg+Acc:  kuˊká
    kukká+N+Sg+Ill:  kuukán
    kukká+N+Sg+Loc:  kukkáást
    kukká+N+Sg+Com:  kukkáin
    kukká+N+Sg+Abe:  kuˊkáttáá
    kukká+N+Ess: kukkán
    kukká+N+Par: kukkád
    kukká+N+Pl+Nom:  kuˊkáh
    kukká+N+Pl+Gen:  kuˊkái
    kukká+N+Pl+Acc:  kukkáid
    kukká+N+Pl+Ill:  kukkáid
    kukká+N+Pl+Loc:  kuˊkáin
    kukká+N+Pl+Com:  kuˊkáiguin
    kukká+N+Pl+Abe:  kuˊkáittáá

  Noun - sukká:
    sukká+N+Sg+Nom:  sukká
    sukká+N+Sg+Gen:  suˊhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Acc:  suˊhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Ill:  suukán
    sukká+N+Sg+Loc:  suhháást
    sukká+N+Sg+Com:  suhháin
    sukká+N+Sg+Abe:  suˊháttáá
    sukká+N+Ess:  sukkán
    sukká+N+Par:  sukkád
    sukká+N+Pl+Nom:  suˊháh
    sukká+N+Pl+Gen:  suˊhái
    sukká+N+Pl+Acc:  suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Ill:  suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Loc:  suˊháin
    sukká+N+Pl+Com:  suˊháiguin
    sukká+N+Pl+Abe:  suˊháittáá

  Noun - juŋkká:
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Nom:  juŋkká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Gen:  juˊŋká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Acc:  juˊŋká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Ill:  juuŋkán
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Loc:  juŋkkáást
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Com:  juŋkkáin
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Abe:  juˊŋkáttáá
    juŋkká+N+Ess:  juŋkkán
    juŋkká+N+Par:  juŋkkád
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Nom:  juˊŋkáh
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Gen:  juˊŋkái
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Acc:  juŋkkáid
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Ill:  juŋkkáid
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Loc:  juˊŋkáin
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Com:  juˊŋkáiguin
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Abe:  juˊŋkáittáá

  Noun - rullá:
    rullá+N+Sg+Nom:  rullá
    rullá+N+Sg+Gen:  ruḷá
    rullá+N+Sg+Acc:  ruḷá
    rullá+N+Sg+Ill:  ruuḷán
    rullá+N+Sg+Loc:  rulláást
    rullá+N+Sg+Com:  rulláin
    rullá+N+Sg+Abe:  ruˊḷáttáá
    rullá+N+Ess:  rullán
    rullá+N+Par:  rullád
    rullá+N+Pl+Nom:  ruˊḷáh
    rullá+N+Pl+Gen:  ruˊḷái
    rullá+N+Pl+Acc:  rulláid
    rullá+N+Pl+Ill:  rulláid
    rullá+N+Pl+Loc:  ruˊḷáin
    rullá+N+Pl+Com:  ruˊḷáiguin
    rullá+N+Pl+Abe:  ruˊḷáittáá

  Noun - urná:
    urná+N+Sg+Nom:  urná
    urná+N+Sg+Gen:  uˊrná
    urná+N+Sg+Acc:  uˊrná
    urná+N+Sg+Ill:  uurnán
    urná+N+Sg+Loc:  urnáást
    urná+N+Sg+Com:  urnáin
    urná+N+Sg+Abe:  uˊrnáttáá
    urná+N+Ess:  urnán
    urná+N+Par: urnád
    urná+N+Pl+Nom:  uˊrnáh
    urná+N+Pl+Gen:  uˊrnái
    urná+N+Pl+Acc:  urnáid
    urná+N+Pl+Ill:  urnáid
    urná+N+Pl+Loc:  urnáin
    urná+N+Pl+Com:  uˊrnáiguin
    urná+N+Pl+Abe:  uˊrnáittáá

  Noun - juná:
    juná+N+Sg+Nom:  juná
    juná+N+Sg+Gen:  juná
    juná+N+Sg+Acc:  juná
    juná+N+Sg+Ill:  junán
    juná+N+Sg+Loc:  junást
    juná+N+Sg+Com:  junáin
    juná+N+Sg+Abe:  junáttáá
    juná+N+Ess:  junán
    juná+N+Ess:  junád
    juná+N+Pl+Nom:  junáh
    juná+N+Pl+Gen:  junái
    juná+N+Pl+Acc:  junáid
    juná+N+Pl+Ill:  junáid
    juná+N+Pl+Loc:  junáin
    juná+N+Pl+Com:  junáiguin
    juná+N+Pl+Abe:  junáittáá

  Noun - tuvvá:
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Nom:  tuvvá
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Gen:  tuṿá
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Acc:  tuṿá
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Ill:  tuuṿán
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Loc:  tuvváást
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Com:  tuvváin
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Abe:  tuˊváttáá
    tuvvá+N+Ess:  tuvván
    tuvvá+N+Par:  tuvvád
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Nom:  tuˊṿáh
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Gen:  tuˊṿái
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Acc:  tuvváid
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Ill:  tuvváid
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Loc:  tuvváin
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Com:  tuˊṿáiguin
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Abe:  tuˊṿáittáá

  Noun - čuhčá:
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Nom:  čuhčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Gen:  čuuvčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Acc:  čuuvčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Ill:  čuuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Loc:  čuuvčást
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Com:  čuvččáin
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Abe:  čuˊvčáttáá
    čuhčá+N+Ess:  čuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Par: čuhčád
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Nom:  [čuuvčáh, čuˊvčáh]
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Gen:  [čuuvčái, čuˊvčái]
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Acc:  čuuvčáid
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Ill:  čuvččáid
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Loc:  čuuvčáin
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Com:  čuˊvčáiguin
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Abe:  čuˊvčáittáá

  Noun - fáddá:
    fáddá+N+Sg+Nom:  fáddá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Gen:  fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Acc:  fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Ill:  fáádán
    fáddá+N+Sg+Loc:  fáádást
    fáddá+N+Sg+Com:  fáddáin
    fáddá+N+Sg+Abe:  fáˊdáttáá
    fáddá+N+Ess:  fáddán
    fáddá+N+Par: fáddád
    fáddá+N+Pl+Nom:  fáádáh
    fáddá+N+Pl+Gen: [fáádái, fáˊdái]
    fáddá+N+Pl+Acc:  fáádáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Ill:  fáddáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Loc:  fáádáin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Com:  fáˊdáiguin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Abe:  fáˊdáittáá

  Noun - fáddá: # á-stems
    fáddá+N+Sg+Nom: fáddá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Gen: fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Acc: fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Ill: fáádán
    fáddá+N+Sg+Loc: fáádást
    fáddá+N+Sg+Abe: fádáttáá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Com: fáddáin
    fáddá+N+Ess: fáddán
    fáddá+N+Par: fáddád
    fáddá+N+Pl+Nom: fáádáh
    fáddá+N+Pl+Gen: fáádái
    fáddá+N+Pl+Acc: fáádáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Loc: fáádáin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Ill: fáddáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Com: fádáiguin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Abe: fádáittáá


  Noun - lággá:
    lággá+N+Sg+Nom:  lággá
    lággá+N+Sg+Gen:  láágá
    lággá+N+Sg+Acc:  láágá
    lággá+N+Sg+Ill:  láágán
    lággá+N+Sg+Loc:  lággáást
    lággá+N+Sg+Com:  lággáin
    lággá+N+Sg+Abe:  láˊgáttáá
    lággá+N+Ess:  lággán
    lággá+N+Par: lággád
    lággá+N+Pl+Nom:  láágáh
    lággá+N+Pl+Gen:  [láágái, lágái]
    lággá+N+Pl+Acc:  láágáid
    lággá+N+Pl+Ill:  lággáid
    lággá+N+Pl+Loc:  láágáin
    lággá+N+Pl+Com:  láˊgáiguin
    lággá+N+Pl+Abe:  láˊgáittáá

  Noun - hágá:
    hágá+N+Sg+Nom:  hágá
    hágá+N+Sg+Gen:  hágá
    hágá+N+Sg+Acc:  hágá
    hágá+N+Sg+Ill:  hágán
    hágá+N+Sg+Loc:  hágást
    hágá+N+Sg+Com:  hágáin
    hágá+N+Sg+Abe:  hágáttáá
    hágá+N+Ess:  hágán
    hágá+N+Par:  hágád
    hágá+N+Pl+Nom:  hágáh
    hágá+N+Pl+Gen:  hágái
    hágá+N+Pl+Acc:  hágáid
    hágá+N+Pl+Ill:  hágáid
    hágá+N+Pl+Loc:  hágáin
    hágá+N+Pl+Com:  hágáiguin
    hágá+N+Pl+Abe:  hágáittáá

  Noun - kámppá:
    kámppá+N+Sg+Nom:  kámppá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Gen:  káˊmpá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Acc:  káˊmpá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Ill:  káámpán
    kámppá+N+Sg+Loc:  kámppáást
    kámppá+N+Sg+Com:  kámppáin
    kámppá+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊmpáttáá
    kámppá+N+Ess:  kámppán
    kámppá+N+Par: kámppád
    kámppá+N+Pl+Nom:  káˊmpáh
    kámppá+N+Pl+Gen:  káˊmpái
    kámppá+N+Pl+Acc:  kámppáid
    kámppá+N+Pl+Ill:  kámppáid
    kámppá+N+Pl+Loc:  káˊmpáin
    kámppá+N+Pl+Com:  káˊmpáiguin
    kámppá+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊmpáittáá

  Noun - ráksá:
    ráksá+N+Sg+Nom:  ráksá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Acc:  ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Ill:  rááksán
    ráksá+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávsást
    ráksá+N+Sg+Com:  rávssáin
    ráksá+N+Sg+Abe:  ráˊvsáttáá
    ráksá+N+Ess:  ráksán
    ráksá+N+Par: ráksád
    ráksá+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávsáh
    ráksá+N+Pl+Gen: [ráávsái, ráˊvsái]
    ráksá+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávsáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Ill:  rávssáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávsáin
    ráksá+N+Pl+Com:  ráˊvsáiguin
    ráksá+N+Pl+Abe:  ráˊvsáittáá

  Noun - vársá:
    vársá+N+Sg+Nom:  vársá
    vársá+N+Sg+Gen:  váˊrsá
    vársá+N+Sg+Acc: váˊrsá
    vársá+N+Sg+Ill:  váársán
    vársá+N+Sg+Loc:  vársáást
    vársá+N+Sg+Com:  vársáin
    vársá+N+Sg+Abe:  váˊrsáttáá
    vársá+N+Ess:  vársán
    vársá+N+Par: vársád
    vársá+N+Pl+Nom:  váˊrsáh
    vársá+N+Pl+Gen:  [vársái, váˊrsái]
    vársá+N+Pl+Acc:  vársáid
    vársá+N+Pl+Ill:  várˊsáid
    vársá+N+Pl+Loc:  vársáin
    vársá+N+Pl+Com:  váˊrsáiguin
    vársá+N+Pl+Abe:  váˊrsáittáá

  Noun - lássá:
    lássá+N+Sg+Nom:  lássá
    lássá+N+Sg+Gen:  lááṣá
    lássá+N+Sg+Acc:  lááṣá
    lássá+N+Sg+Ill:  lááṣán
    lássá+N+Sg+Loc:  lááṣást
    lássá+N+Sg+Com:  lássáin
    lássá+N+Sg+Abe:  láˊsáttáá
    lássá+N+Ess:  lássán
    lássá+N+Par: lássád
    lássá+N+Pl+Nom:  lááṣáh
    lássá+N+Pl+Gen: [lááṣái, láṣái]
    lássá+N+Pl+Acc:  lááṣáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Ill:  lássáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Loc:  lááṣáin
    lássá+N+Pl+Com:  láˊsáiguin
    lássá+N+Pl+Abe:  láˊsáittáá

  Noun - lássá: # á-stems
    lássá+N+Sg+Nom: lássá
    lássá+N+Sg+Gen: lááṣá
    lássá+N+Sg+Acc: lááṣá
    lássá+N+Sg+Ill: lááṣán
    lássá+N+Sg+Loc: lááṣást
    lássá+N+Sg+Com: lássáin
    lássá+N+Sg+Abe: láṣáttáá
    lássá+N+Ess: lássán
    lássá+N+Par: lássád
    lássá+N+Pl+Nom: lááṣáh
    lássá+N+Pl+Gen: lááṣái
    lássá+N+Pl+Acc: lááṣáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Ill: lássáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Loc: lááṣáin
    lássá+N+Pl+Com: láṣáiguin
    lássá+N+Pl+Abe: láṣáittáá

  Noun - pálstá:
    pálstá+N+Sg+Nom:  pálstá
    pálstá+N+Sg+Gen:  páˊlstá
    pálstá+N+Sg+Acc: páˊlstá
    pálstá+N+Sg+Ill:  páálstán
    pálstá+N+Sg+Loc:  pálstáást
    pálstá+N+Sg+Com:  pálstáin
    pálstá+N+Sg+Abe:  páˊlstáttáá
    pálstá+N+Ess:  pálstán
    pálstá+N+Par: pálstád
    pálstá+N+Pl+Nom:  páˊlstáh
    pálstá+N+Pl+Gen:  páˊlstái
    pálstá+N+Pl+Acc:  pálstáid
    pálstá+N+Pl+Ill:  pálstáid
    pálstá+N+Pl+Loc:  pálstáin
    pálstá+N+Pl+Com:  páˊlstáiguin
    pálstá+N+Pl+Abe:  páˊlstáittáá
